src/morphology/affixes/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON ALISTStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON NUOSKITStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
! DeverbalNounsNUOSKIT ; !L2

LEXICON BEAGASJStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITTASJ ;

LEXICON HURAIStem
 :d%> SG3PASS ;
 HURAIINCH ;
 :d%> DeverbalNounsMUITTASJ ;


LEXICON GEAGAT_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;
! This lexicon goes as ALIST except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that geagadit takes acc objects, but does not have passive.

LEXICON BUOVVAL_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL ;




! Passives and impersonals
! ------------------------


LEXICON SG3PASSV
!  :Y7j SG3PASSinfl ;
! +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:»Y7 SG3PASSinfl ; !The j was doubled, try w/o (TH, r)
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7 SG3PASSinfl ; !The j was needed, back again. (TT, r19658, NOW removed again 080908 TO, it is already in single pointers in SG3PASSinfl, and with j here we get forms like:joavgat
 +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV:»Y7juvvo%> SG3PASSinfl ; ! Short and long, that is

LEXICON SG3PASS
 +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV:»uvvo%> SG3PASSinfl ;

LEXICON SG3PASSinfl
 +Actio+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess:»Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Ess:»Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Gen:»Y5n K ;   ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>Y5le K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>Y5še K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%>Y5lij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3:%>Y5šij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Pl3+Use/NG:%>Y5ledje%> K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Pl3:%>Y5šedje%> K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Pl3+Use/NG:%>Y5le K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Pl3:%>Y5še K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell:»Y5n R ; !L2
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen+Use/-Spell:»Y5ma R ; !L2
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen+Use/-Spell:»Y5mijd R ; !L2
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +ConNegII:jehko%> ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Sg3:jehko%>s ENDLEX ;
 +Imprt+Pl3:jehko%>set ENDLEX ;
 +Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>Y5 K ;
 +Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>Y5 K ;
 +Ind+Prt+Sg3:Y6j K ;
 +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>Y5jit K ;
 +Ind+Prt+Pl3:Y5jedje%> K ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>Y5ž K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>Y5ž K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>Y5ža K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Pl3:%>Y5žit K ;
!+PrfPrc:X2n K ; ! X2 gives i:á, e:á, u:0, comm. out. TT.
 +PrfPrc:%>Y5n K ;
 +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>Y5n K ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV7 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV8 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON ContrImpersonal
 +Ind+Prs+Sg3:Q1 K ;
 +Ind+Prt+Sg3:j K ;
 +Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
 +PrfPrc:n K ;
 +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:n K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3:šij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:lij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg:še K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:le K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/%-GG:ž K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/%-KJ:ža K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:ž K ;
 +Imprt+Sg3:jehko%>s K ;
 +ConNegII:jehko%> K ;
 +Inf:t K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijnna K ;
 +Actio+Nom:n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:me K ;
 +Actio+Ess:min K ;
 +Actio+Ess:men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:mijn K ;
 +PrfPrc:X2n K ;
 +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:X2n K ;
 NominalFormsV7 ;
 NominalFormsV8 ;
 NominalFormsV9 ;
