src/morphology/stems/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON Verb
buovadit:buovad GEAGAT_TV ;
buovvalit:buovval BUOVVAL_TV ;
báttástit:báttást GEAGAT_TV ;
geagadit:geagad GEAGAT_TV ;
geagihit:geagih GEAGAT_TV ;
guoigalit:guojgal BUOVVAL_TV ;
láhttestit:láhttest GEAGAT_TV ;
niibbástit:nijbbást GEAGAT_TV ;
ruovddástit:ruovddást GEAGAT_TV ;
soappástit:soappást GEAGAT_TV ;
sáittástit:sájttást GEAGAT_TV ;
